North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-23.1 Laetrile

23-23.1-01.
Use of laetrile authorized.

No hospital or health facility may interfere with the physician-patient relationship by restricting or forbidding the use of amygdalin when prescribed or administered by a licensed physician and requested by a patient unless the substance as prescribed or administered by the physician is found to be harmful by the North Dakota board of medicine in a hearing conducted pursuant to chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 322, § 1; 2015, ch. 297, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

23-23.1-02.
Disciplinary action for administering or prescribing laetrile subject to finding of harmfulness.

No physician may be subject to disciplinary action by the North Dakota board of medicine for prescribing or administering amygdalin to a patient under the physician’s care who has requested the substance unless the board, in a hearing conducted pursuant to chapter 28-32, has made a formal finding that the substance is harmful.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 322, § 2; 2015, ch. 297, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

23-23.1-03.
Hearing of board on effects of laetrile — Rules.

Any person may petition, or the board on its own motion may convene, a public hearing to determine the effects of the use of amygdalin and to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 28-32 as to its use and administration.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 322, § 3.